src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_14HAMMAS-SG
+N:     NMN_14HAMMAS-SG ;
LEXICON N_14HAMMAS-PL
+N:     NMN_14HAMMAS-PL ;


LEXICON N_PEREH !!= @CODE@ pereh:pereh
! vowel_harmony: front
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITSʼKAS due to word final h
        N_PEREH-SG ;
        N_PEREH-PL ;
LEXICON N_PEREH-SG
+N:     NMN_PEREH-SG ;
LEXICON N_PEREH-PL
+N:     NMN_PEREH-PL ;

LEXICON N_HAMÕH !!= @CODE@ hamõh:hamõh
! vowel_harmony: back
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITSʼKAS due to word final h
        N_HAMÕH-SG ;
        N_HAMÕH-PL ;
LEXICON N_HAMÕH-SG
+N:     NMN_HAMÕH-SG ;
LEXICON N_HAMÕH-PL
+N:     NMN_HAMÕH-PL ;


LEXICON N_15KOTUS
!! kotus:kotus
!! * Yaml: __N-kotus15__
        N_15KOTUS-SG ;
        N_15KOTUS-PL ;
LEXICON N_15KOTUS-SG
+N:     NMN_15KOTUS-SG ;
LEXICON N_15KOTUS-PL
+N:     NMN_15KOTUS-PL ;


LEXICON N_16INEMINE !!= @CODE@
!! inemine:inemi
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: __N-inemine16__
	N_16INEMINE-SG ;
	N_16INEMINE-PL ;
LEXICON N_16INEMINE-SG
+N:	NMN_16INEMINE-SG ;
LEXICON N_16INEMINE-PL
+N:	NMN_16INEMINE-PL ;

LEXICON N_16ABILINÕ !!= @CODE@
!! abilinõ:abili
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: __N-abilinw16__
	N_16ABILINÕ-SG ;
	N_16ABILINÕ-PL ;
LEXICON N_16ABILINÕ-SG
+N:	NMN_16ABILINÕ-SG ;
LEXICON N_16ABILINÕ-PL
+N:	NMN_16ABILINÕ-PL ;

LEXICON N_18AIVASTUS
        N_18AIVASTUS-SG ;
        N_18AIVASTUS-PL ;
LEXICON N_18AIVASTUS-SG
+N:     NMN_18AIVASTUS-SG ;
LEXICON N_18AIVASTUS-PL
+N:     NMN_18AIVASTUS-PL ;


LEXICON N_18EHITÜS
        N_18EHITÜS-SG ;
        N_18EHITÜS-PL ;
LEXICON N_18EHITÜS-SG
+N:     NMN_18EHITÜS-SG ;
LEXICON N_18EHITÜS-PL
+N:     NMN_18EHITÜS-PL ;

LEXICON N_19ALOMANÕ !!= @CODE@ alomanõ:aloma
! Gradation: No
        N_19ALOMANÕ-SG ;
        N_19ALOMANÕ-PL ;
LEXICON N_19ALOMANÕ-SG
+N:     NMN_19ALOMANÕ-SG ;
LEXICON N_19ALOMANÕ-PL
+N:     NMN_19ALOMANÕ-PL ;

LEXICON N_19PEDÄJÄNE !!= @CODE@ pedäjäne:pedäjä
! Gradation: No
	N_19PEDÄJÄNE-SG ;
	N_19PEDÄJÄNE-PL ;
LEXICON N_19PEDÄJÄNE-SG
+N:	NMN_19PEDÄJÄNE-SG ;
LEXICON N_19PEDÄJÄNE-PL
+N:	NMN_19PEDÄJÄNE-PL ;

LEXICON N_20LATSʼ !!= @CODE@ latsʼ:lats
	N_20LATSʼ-SG ;
        N_20LATSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_20LATSʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_20LATSʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_20LATSʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_20LATSʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_20TÄÜSʼ !!= @CODE@ täüsʼ:täü
        N_20TÄÜSʼ-SG ;
	N_20TÄÜSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_20TÄÜSʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_20TÄÜSʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_20TÄÜSʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_20TÄÜSʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_20VÄITSʼ !!= @CODE@ väitsʼ:väits
        N_20VÄITSʼ-SG ;
	N_20VÄITSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_20VÄITSʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_20VÄITSʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_20VÄITSʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_20VÄITSʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_20KÜÜDSʼ !!= @CODE@ küüdsʼ:küüds
	N_20KÜÜDSʼ-SG ;
        N_20KÜÜDSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_20KÜÜDSʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_20KÜÜDSʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_20KÜÜDSʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_20KÜÜDSʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_20MIISʼ
	N_20MIISʼ-SG ;
        N_20MIISʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_20MIISʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_20MIISʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_20MIISʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_20MIISʼ-PL ;


LEXICON N_21HÜDSI !!= @CODE@ hüdsi:hüdsi
	N_21HÜDSI-SG ;
        N_21HÜDSI-PL ;
LEXICON N_21HÜDSI-SG
+N:     NMN_21HÜDSI-SG ;
LEXICON N_21HÜDSI-PL
+N:     NMN_21HÜDSI-PL ;

LEXICON N_22VÕROKÕNÕ !!= @CODE@ võrokõnõ:võrokõ
! Gradation: No
        N_22VÕROKÕNÕ-SG ;
	N_22VÕROKÕNÕ-PL ;
LEXICON N_22VÕROKÕNÕ-SG
+N:     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ-SG ;
LEXICON N_22VÕROKÕNÕ-PL
+N:     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ-PL ;

LEXICON N_22NAANÕ !!= @CODE@ naanõ:naa
! Gradation: No
        N_22NAANÕ-SG ;
        N_22NAANÕ-PL ;
LEXICON N_22NAANÕ-SG
+N:     NMN_22NAANÕ-SG ;
LEXICON N_22NAANÕ-PL
+N:     NMN_22NAANÕ-PL ;

LEXICON N_22VÄHÄKENE !!= @CODE@ vähäkene:vähäke
! Gradation: No
        N_22VÄHÄKENE-SG ;
        N_22VÄHÄKENE-PL ;
LEXICON N_22VÄHÄKENE-SG
+N:     NMN_22VÄHÄKENE-SG ;
LEXICON N_22VÄHÄKENE-PL
+N:     NMN_22VÄHÄKENE-PL ;

LEXICON N_23NUULʼ !!= * @CODE@ nuulʼ:nool
! Gradation: No
 N_23NUULʼ-SG ;
 N_23NUULʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_23NUULʼ-SG
+N: NMN_23NUULʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_23NUULʼ-PL
+N: NMN_23NUULʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_23SUURʼ !!= * @CODE@ suurʼ:suur
! Gradation: No
 N_23SUURʼ-SG ;
 N_23SUURʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_23SUURʼ-SG
+N: NMN_23SUURʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_23SUURʼ-PL
+N: NMN_23SUURʼ-PL ;


LEXICON N_23KIILʼ  !!= * @CODE@ kiilʼ:keel
! Gradation: No
 N_23KIILʼ-SG ;
 N_23KIILʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_23KIILʼ-SG
+N: NMN_23KIILʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_23KIILʼ-PL
+N: NMN_23KIILʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_23HIIRʼ  !!= * @CODE@ hiirʼ:hiir
! Gradation: No
 N_23HIIRʼ-SG ;
 N_23HIIRʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_23HIIRʼ-SG
+N: NMN_23HIIRʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_23HIIRʼ-PL
+N: NMN_23HIIRʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_24KÄSI
! gradation: yes
! vowel_harmony: front
 N_24KÄSI-SG ;
 N_24KÄSI-PL ;
LEXICON N_24KÄSI-SG
+N: NMN_24KÄSI-SG ;
LEXICON N_24KÄSI-PL
+N: NMN_24KÄSI-PL ;
+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

LEXICON N_24SUSI
! gradation: yes
! vowel_harmony: front
 N_24SUSI-SG ;
 N_24SUSI-PL ;
LEXICON N_24SUSI-SG
+N: NMN_24SUSI-SG ;
LEXICON N_24SUSI-PL
+N: NMN_24SUSI-PL ;
+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

LEXICON N_25SÜÄQ
        N_25SÜÄQ-SG ;
        N_25SÜÄQ-PL ;
LEXICON N_25SÜÄQ-SG
+N:     NMN_25SÜÄQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_25SÜÄQ-PL
+N:     NMN_25SÜÄQ-PL ;

LEXICON N_25ASÕQ
        N_25ASÕQ-SG ;
        N_25ASÕQ-PL ;
LEXICON N_25ASÕQ-SG
+N:     NMN_25ASÕQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_25ASÕQ-PL
+N:     NMN_25ASÕQ-PL ;

LEXICON N_26HEPEMʼ
 N_26HEPEMʼ-SG ;
 N_26HEPEMʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_26HEPEMʼ-SG
+N: NMN_26HEPEMʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_26HEPEMʼ-PL
+N: NMN_26HEPEMʼ-PL ;
+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

LEXICON N_27EHEQ
 N_27EHEQ-SG ;
 N_27EHEQ-PL ;
LEXICON N_27EHEQ-SG
+N: NMN_27EHEQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_27EHEQ-PL
+N: NMN_27EHEQ-PL ;
+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

LEXICON N_HAPU !!= * __@CODE@__ hapu:hapu
! gradation: yes
 N_HAPU-SG ;
 N_HAPU-PL ;
LEXICON N_HAPU-SG
+N: NMN_HAPU-SG ;
LEXICON N_HAPU-PL
+N: NMN_HAPU-PL ;

LEXICON N_28TÜTÄRʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ tütärʼ:tütär
 N_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG ;
 N_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG
+N: NMN_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL
+N: NMN_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_28PAPÕRʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ papõrʼ:papõr
 N_28PAPÕRʼ-SG ;
 N_28PAPÕRʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_28PAPÕRʼ-SG
+N: NMN_28PAPÕRʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_28PAPÕRʼ-PL
+N: NMN_28PAPÕRʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_28KANNÕLʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ kannõlʼ:kandõl
 N_28KANNÕLʼ-SG ;
 N_28KANNÕLʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_28KANNÕLʼ-SG
+N: NMN_28KANNÕLʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_28KANNÕLʼ-PL
+N: NMN_28KANNÕLʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_28SÕSARʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ sõsarʼ:sõsar
 N_28SÕSARʼ-SG ;
 N_28SÕSARʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_28SÕSARʼ-SG
+N: NMN_28SÕSARʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_28SÕSARʼ-PL
+N: NMN_28SÕSARʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_28PUNDAR
 N_28PUNDAR-SG ;
 N_28PUNDAR-PL ;
LEXICON N_28PUNDAR-SG
+N: NMN_28PUNDAR-SG ;
LEXICON N_28PUNDAR-PL
+N: NMN_28PUNDAR-PL ;

LEXICON N_29KUU !!= * @CODE@ kuu:kuu
! Gradation: No
 N_29KUU-SG ;
 N_29KUU-PL ;
LEXICON N_29KUU-SG
+N: NMN_29KUU-SG ;
LEXICON N_29KUU-PL
+N: NMN_29KUU-PL ;

LEXICON N_29HÄÄ !!= * @CODE@ pää:pää
! Gradation: No
 N_29HÄÄ-SG ;
 N_29HÄÄ-PL ;
LEXICON N_29HÄÄ-SG
+N: NMN_29HÄÄ-SG ;
LEXICON N_29HÄÄ-PL
+N: NMN_29HÄÄ-PL ;

LEXICON N_30MAA
! Gradation: No
 N_30MAA-SG ;
 N_30MAA-PL ;
LEXICON N_30MAA-SG
+N: NMN_30MAA-SG ;
LEXICON N_30MAA-PL
+N: NMN_30MAA-PL ;

LEXICON N_30TÜÜ
! Gradation: No
 N_30TÜÜ-SG ;
 N_30TÜÜ-PL ;
LEXICON N_30TÜÜ-SG
+N: NMN_30TÜÜ-SG ;
LEXICON N_30TÜÜ-PL
+N: NMN_30TÜÜ-PL ;

LEXICON N_31TÄI
! Gradation: No
 N_31TÄI-SG ;
 N_31TÄI-PL ;
LEXICON N_31TÄI-SG
+N: NMN_31TÄI-SG ;
LEXICON N_31TÄI-PL
+N: NMN_31TÄI-PL ;

LEXICON N_31MAI
! Gradation: No
 N_31MAI-SG ;
 N_31MAI-PL ;
LEXICON N_31MAI-SG
+N: NMN_31MAI-SG ;
LEXICON N_31MAI-PL
+N: NMN_31MAI-PL ;

LEXICON N_32VERI !!veri:ver
 N_32VERI-SG ;
 N_32VERI-PL ;
LEXICON N_32VERI-SG
+N: NMN_32VERI-SG ;
LEXICON N_32VERI-PL
+N: NMN_32VERI-PL ;

LEXICON N_33IGÄ !!igä:igä
! gradation: yes
 N_33IGÄ-SG ;
 N_33IGÄ-PL ;
LEXICON N_33IGÄ-SG
+N: NMN_33IGÄ-SG ;
LEXICON N_33IGÄ-PL
+N: NMN_33IGÄ-PL ;

LEXICON N_34TULI
 N_34TULI-SG ;
 N_34TULI-PL ;
LEXICON N_34TULI-SG
+N: NMN_34TULI-SG ;
LEXICON N_34TULI-PL
+N: NMN_34TULI-PL ;

LEXICON N_35TARÕ
!! tarõ:tar
 N_35TARÕ-SG ;
 N_35TARÕ-PL ;
LEXICON N_35TARÕ-SG
+N: NMN_35TARÕ-SG ;
LEXICON N_35TARÕ-PL
+N: NMN_35TARÕ-PL ;

LEXICON N_35PESÄ
!! pesä:tar
 N_35PESÄ-SG ;
 N_35PESÄ-PL ;
LEXICON N_35PESÄ-SG
+N: NMN_35PESÄ-SG ;
LEXICON N_35PESÄ-PL
+N: NMN_35PESÄ-PL ;


LEXICON N_35NIMI
!! nimi:nim
 N_35NIMI-SG ;
 N_35NIMI-PL ;
