src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
asõq:asõ N_25ASÕQ  "" ;
eloasõq:elo#asõ N_25ASÕQ  "" ;
hapu:hapu N_HAPU  "" ;
hiussõq:hius N_15KOTUS-PL  "" ;
hüdsi:hüdsi N_21HÜDSI  "" ;
iirläne:iirlä N_16INEMINE  "" ;
ilvessusi:ilves#sud N_24SUSI  "" ;
imeh:imme N_PEREH  "" ;
inemiselatsʼ:inemise#lats N_20LATSʼ  "" ;
jahimiisʼ:jahi#miisʼ N_20MIISʼ  "" ;
johus:johus N_15KOTUS  "" ;
jutuajaminõ:jutuajami N_16ABILINÕ  "" ;
juunʼ:joon N_23NUULʼ  "" ;
kaasʼ:kaasʼ N_20VÄITSʼ  "" ;
kallõh:kallõ N_HAMÕH  "" ;
kannõlʼ:kannõl N_28KANNÕLʼ  "" ;
kapstapää:kapstapää N_29KUU  "" ;
karistus:karistus N_18EHITÜS  "" ;
kasulatsʼ:kasu#lats N_20LATSʼ  "" ;
kiireq:kiir N_23KIILʼ-PL  "" ;
koi:koi N_31TÄI  "" ;
kolmkümmend:kolmkümmend N_27EHEQ  "" ;
krassimiisʼ:krassi#miisʼ N_20MIISʼ  "" ;
kubõq:kubõ N_25ASÕQ  "" ;
kukarʼ:kukar N_28TÜTÄRʼ  "" ;
kuninganaanõ:kuninganaanõ N_22VÕROKÕNÕ  "" ;
kupõmʼ:kupõmʼ N_26HEPEMʼ  "" ;
kusi:kusi N_21HÜDSI  "" ;
käepühüs:käepühüs N_15KOTUS  "" ;
kämmäl:kämmäl N_28PUNDAR  "" ;
kärbläsesiinʼ:kärbläse#seen N_23KIILʼ  "" ;
käsi:käd N_24KÄSI  "" ;
käsitüü:käsi#tüü N_30TÜÜ  "" ;
kõllakas:kõllakas N_19ALOMANÕ  "" ;
kõllatõbi:kõlla#tõbi N_33IGÄ  "" ;
kõrsʼ:kõrsʼ N_20VÄITSʼ  "" ;
köüdsʼ:köüds N_20KÜÜDSʼ  "" ;
köüdsʼ:köüds N_20KÜÜDSʼ  "" ;
lahaspuulʼ:lahas#pool N_23NUULʼ  "" ;
laiõh:laiõ N_HAMÕH  "" ;
latsõlatsʼ:latsõ#lats N_20LATSʼ  "" ;
lauluimä:lauluimä N_35TARÕ  "" ;
lehepuu:lehepuu N_29KUU  "" ;
liikminõ:liikmi N_16ABILINÕ  "" ;
loogaküüdsʼ:looga#küüds N_20KÜÜDSʼ  "" ;
luudusõtsäpändämine:luudusõtsäpändämi N_16INEMINE  "" ;
lõgimõq:lõgimõq N_26HEPEMʼ  "" ;
majandus:majandus N_18EHITÜS  "" ;
marutõbi:maru#tõbi N_33IGÄ  "" ;
merehüdsi:merehüdsi N_21HÜDSI  "" ;
meri:mer N_32VERI  "" ;
moonamiisʼ:moona#miisʼ N_20MIISʼ  "" ;
murtusüä:murtu#süä N_25SÜÄQ  "" ;
mustaqhambaq:mustaq#hamba N_14HAMMAS-PL  "" ;
muu:muu N_30TÜÜ  "" ;
myni:myni N_21HÜDSI  "" ;
mõtsapüvi:mõtsa#püv N_35NIMI  "" ;
nahkhiirʼ:nahk#hiir N_23KIILʼ  "" ;
nallʼakas:nallʼakas N_19ALOMANÕ  "" ;
nellikümmend:nellikümmend N_27EHEQ  "" ;
niidsʼ:niids N_20KÜÜDSʼ  "" ;
nulgavoodõh:nulga#vootõ N_HAMÕH  "" ;
paganatuli:pagana#tul N_34TULI  "" ;
pakalʼ:pakal N_28TÜTÄRʼ  "" ;
pakkrattaq:pakk#ratta N_14HAMMAS-PL  "" ;
pallʼokõnõ:pallʼokõ N_22VÕROKÕNÕ  "" ;
paoss:paoss N_15KOTUS  "" ;
papagoi:papagoi N_31TÄI  "" ;
parsʼ:parsʼ N_20VÄITSʼ  "" ;
pasʼminõ:pasʼmi N_16ABILINÕ  "" ;
pereh:perre N_PEREH  "" ;
pesä:pesä N_35PESÄ  "" ;
pinkʼrattaq:pinkʼ#ratta N_14HAMMAS-PL  "" ;
piopesä:piopesä N_35PESÄ  "" ;
poolõterämiisʼ:poolõterä#miisʼ N_20MIISʼ  "" ;
pundar:pundar N_28PUNDAR  "" ;
pyngahus:pyngahus N_18EHITÜS  "" ;
püvi:püv N_35NIMI  "" ;
rattaq:ratta N_14HAMMAS-PL  "" ;
raudkäsi:raud#käd N_24KÄSI  "" ;
rehekuu:rehekuu N_29KUU  "" ;
rihapitim:rihapitim N_26HEPEMʼ  "" ;
ristiinemine:ristiinemi N_16INEMINE  "" ;
roosakas:roosakas N_19ALOMANÕ  "" ;
saarnõh:saarnõ N_HAMÕH  "" ;
sainviirʼ:sain#veer N_23KIILʼ  "" ;
sataitõbi:satai#tõbi N_33IGÄ  "" ;
silmäterä:silmäterä N_35TARÕ  "" ;
susi:sud N_24SUSI  "" ;
suumlanõ:suumla N_16ABILINÕ  "" ;
suunʼ:soon N_23NUULʼ  "" ;
suurʼmeri:suurʼmer N_32VERI  "" ;
säü:säü N_31TÄI  "" ;
süä:süä N_25SÜÄQ  "" ;
talvikõnõ:talvikõ N_22VÕROKÕNÕ  "" ;
tehiterveh:tehi#terve N_PEREH  "" ;
tiivesi:tii#ved N_24KÄSI  "" ;
tsagõmõq:tsagõmõq N_26HEPEMʼ  "" ;
tsibihäniläne:tsibihänilä N_16INEMINE  "" ;
tsignas:tsignas N_15KOTUS  "" ;
tuli:tul N_34TULI  "" ;
tuulõkeerelüs:tuulõkeerelüs N_18EHITÜS  "" ;
tuulõpesä:tuulõpesä N_35PESÄ  "" ;
täüsʼ:täü N_20TÄÜSʼ  "" ;
tõõsõqpoolõq:tõõsõqpool N_23NUULʼ-PL  "" ;
tümi:tüm N_35NIMI  "" ;
tütärʼ:tütär N_28TÜTÄRʼ  "" ;
tütärʼlatsʼ:tütärʼ#lats N_20LATSʼ  "" ;
tüü:tüü N_30TÜÜ  "" ;
uhivesi:uhi#ved N_24KÄSI  "" ;
umbkiilʼ:umb#keel N_23KIILʼ  "" ;
vaheorsʼ:vahe#orsʼ N_20VÄITSʼ  "" ;
vaher:vaher N_28PUNDAR  "" ;
varõmõq:varõ N_25ASÕQ-PL  "" ;
veresuunʼ:vere#soon N_23NUULʼ  "" ;
veri:ver N_32VERI  "" ;
verpjäs:verpjäs N_19ALOMANÕ  "" ;
viisʼkümmend:viisʼkümmend N_27EHEQ  "" ;
vineh:vinne N_PEREH  "" ;
väikogõnõ:väikogõ N_22VÕROKÕNÕ  "" ;
öüdsituli:öüdsi#tul N_34TULI  "" ;
ülä:ülä N_35TARÕ  "" ;
